Georgia, session 2025_26, HB725.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 44-7-13 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to landlord's duties
as to repairs and improvements, is amended by revising subsection (a) as follows:
"(a) The landlord shall keep the premises in repair and shall be liable for all substantial
improvements placed upon the premises by such landlord's consent, including:
(1) The structures shall be structurally sound so as not to pose any threat to the health
and safety of the occupants and so as to protect the residents from hazards;
(2) The housing shall be accessible and capable of being utilized without unauthorized
use of other private properties. Structures shall provide alternate means of egress in case
of fire;
H. B. 725
- 1 -

LC 48 1519
(3) Each resident shall be afforded adequate space and security for himself or herself and
his or her belongings. Each resident shall be provided with an acceptable place to sleep;
(4) Every room or space shall be provided with natural or mechanical ventilation.
Structures shall be free of pollutants in the air at levels that threaten the health of
residents;
(5) The water supply shall be free from contamination;
(6) Residents shall have access to sufficient sanitary facilities that are in proper operating
condition, may be used in privacy, and are adequate for personal cleanliness and the
disposal of human waste;
(7) The housing shall have adequate heating and cooling facilities in proper operating
condition;
(8) The housing shall have adequate natural or artificial illumination to permit normal
indoor activities and to support the health and safety of residents. Sufficient electrical
sources shall be provided to permit use of essential electrical appliances while assuring
safety from fire;
(9) All food preparation areas shall contain suitable space and equipment to store,
prepare, and serve food in a sanitary manner;
(10) The housing and any equipment shall be maintained in sanitary conditions;
(11) Each unit shall include at least one battery operated or hardwired smoke detector,
in proper working condition, on each occupied level of the unit. Smoke detectors shall
be located, to the extent practicable, in a hallway adjacent to a bedroom. If the unit is
occupied by hearing impaired persons, smoke detectors shall have an alarm system
designed for hearing impaired persons in each bedroom occupied by a hearing impaired
person; and
(12) The public areas of all housing shall be equipped with a sufficient number, but not
less than one for each area, of battery operated or hardwired smoke detectors. Public
H. B. 725
- 2 -

LC 48 1519
areas include, but are not limited to, laundry rooms, day-care centers, hallways,
stairwells, and other common areas."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 725
- 3 -